Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 2. Procedure in Criminal Cases.

§ 16.1-129.
Offenses tried on warrants, or as provided in Chapter 7 of Title 19.2.

Every offense of which a court not of record is given jurisdiction under this title may be tried upon a warrant; or the judge of such court may, in his discretion, make an examination into the offense and proceed according to the provisions of Chapter 7 (§

19.2-71

et seq.) of Title 19.2. The word warrant as used in this chapter shall be construed to include a summons or notice requiring a person to appear and answer a charge of having violated any statute, ordinance, or any regulation having the force and effect of law.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1960, c. 373.

Law Review.

For article, “Trial by Jury and Speedy Justice,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 309 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Forgery, §§ 9, 24; 12A M.J. Larceny, § 11.

§ 16.1-129.1.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 75.

§ 16.1-129.2.
Procedure when warrant defective.

Upon the trial of a warrant, the court may, upon its own motion or upon the request either of the attorney for the prosecution or for the accused, amend the form of the warrant in any respect in which it appears to be defective. But when the warrant is so defective in form that it does not substantially appear from the same what is the offense with which the accused is charged, or even when it is not so seriously defective, the judge of the court having examined on oath the original complainant, if there be one, or if he sees good reason to believe that an offense has been committed, then without examination of witnesses, may issue under his own hand his warrant reciting the offense and requiring the defendant in the original warrant to be arrested and brought before him. Upon the arrest of the defendant on the new warrant and his production or appearance in court the trial shall proceed upon the new warrant. When there is an amendment of the original warrant the trial shall proceed on the amended warrant. But whether the warrant is amended or a new warrant is issued, the court before proceeding to trial on the same may grant a continuance to the prosecution or to the defendant upon such terms as to costs as may be proper under the circumstances of the case; provided, however, that if the warrant be amended or if a new warrant be issued after any evidence has been heard, the accused shall be entitled to a continuance as a matter of right.

When a warrant is amended or a new warrant is issued the costs already accrued shall be taxed against the defendant, if he is ultimately convicted, as a part of the costs arising under the new or amended warrant.

History.

1968, c. 495.

Cross references.

For provision on amendment of written pleadings, see Rule 8:8, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

§ 16.1-129.3.
Repealed by Acts 1974, c. 481.

§ 16.1-130.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 499.

Cross references.

For provision as to retention of records of criminal cases in the general district courts and juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see §

16.1-69.55

.

§ 16.1-131.
Subpoenas duces tecum and recognizances of witnesses; applicable provisions.

The provisions of §

16.1-90

with respect to recognizances for witnesses upon the continuation of any case, shall be applicable to proceedings of a criminal nature as well as to civil actions. The provisions of Rule 3A:12 of the Rules of the Supreme Court shall apply to the issuance of a subpoena duces tecum and punishment for failure to comply.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1986, c. 160.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-706. Subpoena Duces Tecum.

§ 16.1-131.1.
Procedure when constitutionality of a statute is challenged in a court not of record.

In any criminal or traffic case in a court not of record, if the court rules that a statute or local ordinance is unconstitutional, it shall upon motion of the Commonwealth, or the locality if a local ordinance is the subject of the ruling, stay the proceedings and issue a written statement of its findings of law and relevant facts, if any, in support of its ruling and shall transmit the case, together with all papers, documents, and evidence connected therewith, to the circuit court for a determination of constitutionality. Either party may file a brief with the circuit court. Either party may request oral argument before the circuit court. The circuit court shall give the issue priority on its docket. If the circuit court rules that the statute or local ordinance is unconstitutional, the Commonwealth or the locality may appeal such interlocutory order to the Court of Appeals and thereafter to the Supreme Court; however, if the circuit court rules that the statute or local ordinance is constitutional, the circuit court shall remand the case to the court not of record for trial consistent with the ruling of the circuit court.

History.

2006, cc. 571, 876; 2010, cc. 303, 609.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 303 and 609 are identical, and inserted “or the locality if a local ordinance is the subject of the ruling” following “Commonwealth” in the first sentence and “or the locality” following “Commonwealth” in the last sentence.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

§ 16.1-132.
Right of appeal.

Any person convicted in a district court of an offense not felonious shall have the right, at any time within ten days from such conviction, and whether or not such conviction was upon a plea of guilty, to appeal to the circuit court. There shall also be an appeal of right from any order or judgment of a district court forfeiting any recognizance or revoking any suspension of sentence.

History.

1956, c. 555.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 8.

For appeals in civil cases, see §§

16.1-106

through

16.1-114.1

.

Law Review.

For comment, “Right to Court-Appointed Counsel for Misdemeanants in Virginia,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 306 (1970).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1970).

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1438 (1971).

For article, “Trial by Jury and Speedy Justice,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 309 (1971).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1206 (1972).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1478 (1973).

For note, “Limiting Judicial Incompetence: The Due Process Right to a Legally Learned Judge in State Minor Court Criminal Proceedings,” see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1454 (1975).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For an article relating to all published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 1997, and July 1, 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1091 (1998).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-3008. Notice of Appeal (General District Court), et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 25, 85, 357, 376, 377, 380, 382; 4C M.J. Constitutional Law, §§ 128, 141; 5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 14; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 15; 12A M.J. Larceny, § 33.

§ 16.1-133.
Withdrawal of appeal.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

16.1-135

, any person convicted in a general district court, a juvenile and domestic relations district court, or a court of limited jurisdiction of an offense not felonious may, at any time before the appeal is heard, withdraw an appeal which has been noted, pay the fine and costs to such court, and serve any sentence which has been imposed.

A person withdrawing an appeal shall give written notice of withdrawal to the court and counsel for the prosecution prior to the hearing date of the appeal. If the appeal is withdrawn more than ten days after conviction, the circuit court shall forthwith enter an order affirming the judgment of the lower court and the clerk shall tax the costs as provided by statute.
Fines and costs shall be collected by the circuit court, and all papers shall be retained in the circuit court clerk’s office.

Where the withdrawal is within ten days after conviction, no additional costs shall be charged, and the judgment of the lower court shall be imposed without further action of the circuit court.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1973, c. 18; 1974, c. 228; 1979, c. 536; 1982, c. 366; 1983, c. 105; 1990, c. 25.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1478 (1973).

For 2003/2004 survey of criminal law and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2004).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-3008. Notice of Appeal (General District Court), et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 232, 376, 381.

§ 16.1-133.1.
Reopening case after conviction.

Within sixty days from the date of conviction of any person in a general district court or juvenile and domestic relations district court for an offense not felonious, the case may be reopened upon the application of such person and for good cause shown. Such application shall be heard by the judge who presided at the trial in which the conviction was had, but if he be not in office, or be absent from the county or city or is otherwise unavailable to hear the application, it may be heard by his successor or by any other judge or substitute judge of such court. If the case is reopened after the case documents have been filed with the circuit court, the clerk of the circuit court shall return the case documents to the district court in which the case was originally tried.

History.

1973, c. 440; 1975, c. 298; 1983, c. 21.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-3005. Order Vacating Plea of Guilty (Court Not of Record).

§ 16.1-134.
Appeal by Commonwealth in revenue cases.

In any case involving the violation of a law relating to the state revenue tried in a court not of record under this title, the Commonwealth shall also have the right at any time within ten days from final judgment to appeal to the circuit court.

History.

1956, c. 555.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 47, 376.

§ 16.1-135.
Bail and recognizance; papers filed with circuit court.

A person who has been convicted of an offense in a district court and who has noted an appeal, either at the time judgment is rendered or subsequent to its entry, shall be given credit for any bond that he may have posted in the court from which he appeals and shall be treated in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 19.2. Any new bond which may be required for the release of such person pending the appeal shall be given before the judge or the clerk of the district court and treated in accordance with Article 1 of Chapter 9 of Title 19.2; however, if the judge or clerk is not available to take the bond, the bond may be given before a magistrate serving the jurisdiction. Whenever an appeal is taken and the ten-day period prescribed by §

16.1-133

has expired the papers shall be promptly filed with the clerk of the circuit court.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1981, c. 159; 1999, cc. 829, 846; 2008, cc. 551, 691.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 829 and 846 are identical, and substituted “Article 1 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 19.2” for “§§

19.2-123

and

19.2-124

” in the first and second sentences.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 are identical, and substituted “magistrate serving the jurisdiction” for “magistrate of the jurisdiction” in the next-to-last sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 376, 378; 5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 14.

§ 16.1-136.
How appeal tried.

Any appeal taken under the provisions of this chapter shall be heard de novo in the appellate court and shall be tried without formal pleadings in writing; and, except in the case of an appeal from any order or judgment of a court not of record forfeiting any recognizance or revoking any suspension of sentence, the accused shall be entitled to trial by a jury in the same manner as if he had been indicted for the offense in the circuit court.

History.

1956, c. 555.

Cross references.

As to procedure on appeal in civil cases, see §§

16.1-106

,

16.1-113

and

16.1-114.1

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law and procedure for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1970).

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1438 (1971).

For article, “Trial by Jury and Speedy Justice,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 309 (1971).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1206 (1972).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1478 (1973).

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1460 (1976).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 379, 380, 382; 2B M.J. Automobiles, § 118; 2C M.J. Autrefois, Acquit and Convict, § 11; 4C M.J. Constitutional Law, §§ 128, 141; 5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 77; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 15; 19 M.J. Warrants, § 6.

§ 16.1-137.
Procedure on appeal when warrant defective.

Upon the trial of the warrant on appeal the court may, upon its own motion or upon the request either of the attorney for the prosecution or for the accused, amend the form of the warrant in any respect in which it appears to be defective. But when the warrant is so defective in form that it does not substantially appear from the same what is the offense with which the accused is charged, or even when it is not so seriously defective, the judge of the court having examined on oath the original complainant, if there be one, or if he sees good reason to believe that an offense has been committed, then without examination of witnesses, may issue under his own hand his warrant reciting the offense and requiring the defendant in the original warrant to be arrested and brought before him. Upon the arrest of the defendant on the new warrant and his production or appearance in court the trial shall proceed upon the new warrant. When there is an amendment of the original warrant the trial shall proceed on the amended warrant. But whether the warrant is amended or a new warrant is issued, the court before proceeding to trial on the same may grant a continuance to the prosecution or to the defendant upon such terms as to costs as may be proper under the circumstances of the case; provided, however, that if the warrant be amended or if a new warrant be issued after any evidence has been heard, the accused shall be entitled to a continuance as a matter of right.

When a warrant is amended or a new warrant is issued the costs already accrued shall be taxed against the defendant, if he is ultimately convicted, as a part of the costs arising under the new or amended warrant.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 399.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 380; 19 M.J. Warrants, §§ 2, 6.

§ 16.1-138.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 499.

Cross references.

As to retention and disposition of district court records, see §

16.1-69.53

et seq.